Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 14 Merger and Consolidation of State Banks and Trust Companies

7-1-530.
Authority to merge, consolidate, or exchange shares; requirements.

Upon compliance with the requirements of this part and other applicable laws and regulations, including any branching and minimum age laws and regulations, banks or trust companies may merge or consolidate, provided that a trust company may merge or consolidate with a bank that is authorized to exercise trust powers so long as the resulting institution is a bank. Upon compliance with the requirements of this part and other applicable laws and regulations, including any branching and minimum age laws and regulations, a corporation other than a bank or trust company may acquire all of the outstanding shares of one or more classes or series of one or more banks or trust companies through a share exchange.

A corporation or limited liability company other than a bank or trust company may be merged into or consolidated with, or may enter into a share exchange with, a bank or trust company, provided that:

The resulting institution of the merger or consolidation is a bank or trust company;

The resulting institution of the merger or consolidation, or the acquired bank or trust company in a share exchange, holds only assets and liabilities and is engaged only in activities which may be held or engaged in by a bank or trust company; and

The merger, share exchange, or consolidation is not otherwise unlawful.

A merger, share exchange, or consolidation pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section shall be made by compliance with the requirements of this part. Title 14 shall not be applicable to such a merger, share exchange, or consolidation.

A merger, share exchange, or consolidation across state lines shall also be subject to the provisions of Part 20 of this article.

In the case of a merger of a Georgia state bank with any other bank or banks, with the Georgia bank as the resulting bank, any assets, lines of business, activities, or powers which may accrue to the resulting bank which would not be allowed for a Georgia state bank shall be provided for in the plan of merger. Such plan shall include the proposal for holding or disposal of such assets or the continuation or termination of such line of business, activity, or power. The department shall review the plan to determine whether, in the interest of safety and soundness and consistent with the other objectives of Code Section 7-1-3, the activity, power, asset, or line of business should be approved, denied, or phased out within a reasonable period of time, to be determined by the department.

As used in this part, the term:

“Bank” includes a national bank or trust company with its main office in this state if such national bank or trust company is merging with a Georgia state bank or trust company.

“Share exchange” means a plan of exchange of all of the outstanding shares of one or more classes or series of shares in accordance with this part.

Subject to the provisions of this part, this Code section does not limit the power of a corporation or limited liability company other than a bank or trust company to acquire all or part of the shares of one or more classes or series of a bank or trust company through a voluntary exchange of shares or otherwise.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 13, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-1401; Ga. L. 1973, p. 278, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2401, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 848, § 8; Ga. L. 1997, p. 485, § 17; Ga. L. 2000, p. 174, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 843, § 6; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 4/SB 70; Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 2-7/HB 811; Ga. L. 2020, p. 320, § 4/HB 781; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 7/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 8/HB 891.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in the first sentence of subsection (a), substituted “a trust company” for “an institution exercising trust powers alone” and “with a bank that is authorized to exercise trust powers so long as the resulting institution is a bank” for “only with another such trust company”.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, deleted “involving one or more banks or trust companies” following “across state lines” in subsection (d); and rewrote subsection (f), which read: “As used in this part, the term ‘share exchange’ means a plan of exchange of all of the outstanding shares of one or more classes or series of shares in accordance with this part.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “or limited liability company” in the introductory language of subsection (b) and in subsection (g).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “article” was substituted for “chapter” in subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article, “Business Associations,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 109 (2001).

7-1-531.
Requirements for merger, share exchange, or consolidation plan; adoption of plan; modification of plan.

The requirements for a merger, share exchange, or consolidation which must be satisfied by the parties thereto are as follows:

The parties shall adopt a plan stating the method, terms, and conditions of the merger, share exchange, or consolidation, including the rights under the plan of the shareholders or members of each of the parties and any agreement concerning the merger, share exchange, or consolidation. Said plan shall specify:

The name that such bank or trust company shall have upon and after such merger, share exchange, or consolidation, which may be the name of any one of the institutions or the combined names of two or more of the institutions or such other name as stated;

The persons who shall constitute the board of directors of the bank or trust company after the merger, share exchange, or consolidation;

In the case of a merger or consolidation, the manner and basis of converting the shares of each merged or consolidated institution into shares or other securities or obligations of the surviving bank or trust company and, if any shares of any of the merged or consolidated institutions are not to be converted solely into shares or other securities of the surviving bank or trust company, the amount of cash or securities of any other corporation, or combination of cash and such securities, which is to be paid or delivered to the holders of such shares in exchange for or upon the surrender of such shares, which cash or securities may be in addition to or in lieu of the shares or other securities of the surviving bank or trust company;

In the case of a share exchange, the terms and conditions of the share exchange and the manner and basis of exchanging the shares to be acquired for shares, obligations, or other securities of the acquiring or any other corporation or for cash or other property in whole or in part; and

Such other provisions with respect to the proposed merger or consolidation as are deemed desirable.

Adoption of the plan by each party thereto shall require the affirmative vote of at least:

A majority of the directors; and

Unless the article or bylaws require a greater vote, the shareholders or members entitled to cast a majority of the votes which all shareholders or members are entitled to cast thereon and, if any class of shares is entitled to vote thereon as a class, the holders of a majority of the outstanding shares of such class, at a meeting of shareholders or members; provided, however, that approval from the shareholders or members of the surviving bank or trust company is not required if the conditions set forth in subsection (h) of Code Section 14-2-1103 are satisfied.

If any party is a national bank, then the adoption of the plan shall comply with the applicable laws of such national bank’s chartering entity, including, but not limited to, any provisions related to the adoption of such plan by the shareholders or members and directors of the bank and to the dissenting rights of shareholders or members of the bank.

Whenever a meeting of shareholders or members is called for the purpose of taking action on a plan, the notice for such meeting shall include a copy or summary of the plan and a full statement of the rights and remedies of dissenting shareholders or members, the method of exercising them, and the limitations on such rights and remedies.

Any modification of a plan which has been adopted shall be made by any method provided therein or, in the absence of such provision, by the same vote as that required for adoption.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 13, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, §§ 13-1401, 13-1402; Ga. L. 1973, p. 278, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2402, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 5/SB 70; Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 10/HB 780; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 8/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 9/HB 891.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, in subparagraph (a)(2)(B), substituted “Unless the article or bylaws require a greater vote, the” for “The” at the beginning, substituted “a majority” for “two-thirds” near the middle, substituted “a majority” for “at least two-thirds” in the middle, and added the proviso at the end; and substituted “Whenever a meeting of shareholders is called for the purpose of taking action on a plan, the notice for such meeting” for “The notice” at the beginning of paragraph (a)(3). See Editor’s notes for applicability.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, redesignated former paragraph (a)(3) as present paragraph (a)(4) and added paragraph (a)(3).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “shareholders or members” for “shareholders” throughout this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 214, § 26(b)/HB 780, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “It is not the intent of the General Assembly to affect the law applicable to litigation pending as of March 9, 2018.”

7-1-532.
Execution, contents, and filing of articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation; notice; filing amendment.

Upon adoption of the plan of merger, share exchange, or consolidation as provided in Code Section 7-1-531, the parties to the merger, share exchange, or consolidation shall file with the department articles of a merger, share exchange, or consolidation as required by this Code section, together with the fee required by Code Section 7-1-862.

The articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation shall be signed by two duly authorized officers of each party to the plan under their respective seals and shall contain:

The names of the parties to the plan and of the resulting bank or trust company or the acquiring corporation in a share exchange;

The street address and county of the location of the main office and registered agent and registered office of each;

The votes by which the plan was adopted and the time, place, and notice of each meeting in connection with such adoption;

The name and county of residence of each director of the resulting bank or trust company or each director of the acquired corporation in a share exchange;

In the case of a merger, any amendment of the articles of the resulting bank or trust company;

In the case of a consolidation, the provisions required in articles of a new bank or trust company by paragraphs (4), (5), (6), (7), and (10) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-392; and

The plan.

Together with the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation, the parties shall deliver to the department a copy of the notice of merger, share exchange, or consolidation and an undertaking, which may appear in the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation or be set forth in a letter or other instrument executed by an officer or any person authorized to act on behalf of such bank or trust company, that the request for publication of a notice of filing the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation and payment therefor will be made as required by subsection (d) of this Code section.

No later than the next business day after filing the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation with the department, the parties shall mail or deliver to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the main office of each party is located a notice which shall contain a statement that the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation have been filed with the department, the names of the institutions which are parties to the proposed merger, share exchange, or consolidation, and in the case of a merger the proposed name of the surviving bank or trust company, and shall designate a place where a copy of the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation may be examined. Subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 7-1-7 shall also apply to the notice.

The notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks commencing within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper.

In the event the plan is amended as provided in Code Section 7-1-531, the parties shall promptly file with the department an amendment to the articles of consolidation, share exchange, or merger reflecting such amendment of the plan.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 63, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-1403; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 7; Code 1933, § 41A-2403, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 12; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 19; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 24; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 12; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 6/SB 70; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 12/HB 184; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 9/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in paragraph (b)(4), substituted “The name and county of residence of each director” for “The names and addresses of the first directors” at the beginning, and substituted “each director” for “the directors” near the end; and deleted the former first sentence of subsection (e), which read: “The request for publication of the notice shall be accompanied by a check, draft, or money order in the proper amount in payment of the cost of publication.”

7-1-533.
Additional filings with department.

The parties to the plan shall also file with the department:

An application and information desired by the department in order to evaluate the proposed merger, share exchange, or consolidation, which shall be made available in the form specified by the department;

Applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the expenses of the investigation required by Code Section 7-1-534; and

If the merger, share exchange, or consolidation involves the adoption of a new name, a certificate of the Secretary of State reserving said name under Code Section 7-1-131.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 13, §§ 2, 3; Code 1933, § 13-1404; Code 1933, § 41A-2404, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 13; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 20; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 7/SB 70.

7-1-534.
Approval or disapproval by department; resulting bank or trust company not chartered by department.

Upon receipt of the articles of consolidation, share exchange, or merger and the filings required by Code Section 7-1-533, the department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to ascertain whether:

The articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

The plan and any modification thereof adequately protect the interests of depositors, other creditors, and shareholders;

The requirements for a merger, share exchange, or consolidation under all applicable laws have been satisfied and the resulting bank or trust company or the acquired bank or trust company in a share exchange would satisfy the requirements of this chapter applicable to it; and

The merger, share exchange, or consolidation would be consistent with adequate and sound banking or fiduciary practice and in the public interest on the basis of:

The financial history and condition of the parties to the plan;

The proposed business plan; and

The character of their management.

File with the department and the Secretary of State a certificate of the approval of the merger or consolidation by the appropriate regulator.

Within 90 days after receipt of the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation, the notice of merger or share exchange, and the filings required by Code Section 7-1-533, or within an additional period of not more than 30 days after an amendment to the application is received within the initial 90 day period, the department shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove the articles on the basis of its investigation and the criteria set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section. Except as provided in Code Section 7-1-535, the department shall give the Secretary of State written notice of its approval with a copy of the articles of merger, share exchange, or consolidation and a copy of the notice of merger or share exchange attached. The department shall also give the parties to the plan written notice of its decision and, in the event of disapproval, a statement in general of the reasons for its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive, except that it may be subject to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

If a merger or consolidation would result in a bank or trust company that would not be chartered by the department, prior to the consummation of the merger or consolidation, the bank or trust company shall:

Upon receipt of written confirmation from the department that the requirements of this subsection have been satisfied, each party to the merger or consolidation, except the resulting bank or trust company, shall cease to exist as a separate entity, as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-536, and its articles shall automatically terminate.

(A)

Notify the department of the proposed merger or consolidation;

(B)

Provide such evidence of the adoption of the plan of merger or consolidation as the department may request;

(C)

Notify the department of any abandonment or disapproval of the plan of merger or consolidation; and

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2405, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 14; Ga. L. 1995, p. 673, § 21; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 7; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 8/SB 70; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 10/HB 111.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “The proposed business plan; and” for “Their prospects;” in subparagraph (a)(4)(B); substituted a period for “; and” at the end of subparagraph (a)(4)(C); deleted former subparagraph (a)(4)(D), which read: “The convenience and needs of the area primarily to be served by the resulting institution, or by the acquiring corporation and the acquired bank or trust company in a share exchange.”; and added subsection (c).

Cross references.

Requirement that department approve change in control of financial institutions generally, §

7-1-231

.

7-1-535.
Federal approval or disapproval; issuance of certificate of merger, share exchange, or consolidation.

If the laws of the United States require the approval of the merger, share exchange, or consolidation by any federal agency, the department may elect to not act on the application until it receives notice of the decision of such agency.

If all the taxes, fees, and charges required by law shall have been paid and if the name of the resulting bank or trust company in a merger or consolidation continues to be reserved or is available on the records of the Secretary of State, upon receipt of the written approval of the department, the Secretary of State shall issue to the resulting bank or trust company or the acquiring corporation or limited liability company in a share exchange a certificate of merger, share exchange, or consolidation with the approved articles of merger or consolidation attached thereto and shall retain a copy of such certificate, articles, and approval by the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 63, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-1403; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 7; Code 1933, § 41A-2406, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1717, § 7; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 9/SB 70; Ga. L. 2021, p. 323, § 11/HB 111; Ga. L. 2022, p. 220, § 10/HB 891.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “If the laws of the United States require the approval of the merger, share exchange, or consolidation by any federal agency, the department may, at its option, after its approval, retain its notice to the Secretary of State until it receives notice of the decision of such agency. If such agency shall refuse to give its approval, the department may, at its option, notify the parties to the plan that the department’s approval has been rescinded for that reason. If such agency gives its approval, the department shall deliver its written approval to the Secretary of State for issuance of a certificate of merger, share exchange, or consolidation by the Secretary of State and shall notify the parties to the plan.”

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, inserted “or limited liability company” near the middle of subsection (b).

7-1-536.
Effect of merger, share exchange, or consolidation.

As of the issuance of the certificate of merger, share exchange, or consolidation by the Secretary of State, the merger, share exchange, or consolidation shall be effective.

The certificate of merger, share exchange, or consolidation shall be conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions precedent to the merger, share exchange, or consolidation and of the existence or creation of the bank or trust institution, except as against the state.

When a merger or consolidation becomes effective, each party to the plan, except the resulting bank or trust company, shall cease to exist as a separate entity but shall continue in, and the parties to the plan shall be, a single corporation which shall be the bank or trust company and which shall have, without further act or deed, all the property, rights, powers, trusts, duties, and obligations of each party to the plan. When a share exchange becomes effective, the shares of each acquired bank or trust company are exchanged as provided in the plan, and the former holders of the shares are entitled only to the share exchange rights provided in the plan of share exchange or to their rights under Code Section 7-1-537.

The articles of the resulting bank or trust company shall be, in the case of a merger, the same as its articles prior to the merger with any change stated in the articles of merger or, in the case of a consolidation, the provisions stated in the articles of consolidation.

The resulting bank or trust company, or the acquired bank or trust company in a share exchange, shall have the authority to engage only in such business and exercise only such powers as are then permissible upon original incorporation under this chapter and shall be subject to the same prohibitions and limitations as it would then be subject to upon original incorporation. It may, however, subject to permission of the department as set out in Code Sections 7-1-530 and 7-1-555, engage in any business and exercise any right that any bank or trust company which is a party to the plan could lawfully exercise or engage in immediately prior to the merger, share exchange, or consolidation.

No liability of any party to the plan or of its shareholders, directors, or officers shall be affected nor shall any lien on any property of a party to the plan be impaired by the merger, share exchange, or consolidation. Any claim existing or action pending by or against any party to the plan may be prosecuted to judgment as if the merger, share exchange, or consolidation had not taken place or the resulting bank or trust company may be substituted in its place.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 13, § 5; Code 1933, §§ 13-1406, 13-1407; Code 1933, § 41A-2407, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 970, § 6; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 10/SB 70.

7-1-537.
Rights of dissenting shareholders; surrender of certificates.

A shareholder of a bank or trust company which is a party to a plan of proposed merger, share exchange, or consolidation under this part who objects to the plan shall be entitled to the rights and remedies of a dissenting shareholder as determined under Chapter 2 of Title 14, known as the “Georgia Business Corporation Code.”

The bank or trust company into which the other or others have been merged or consolidated, or the acquiring corporation in a share exchange, as the case may be, shall have the right to require the return of the original certificates of stock held by each shareholder in each or either of the institutions and in lieu thereof:

To issue to each shareholder new certificates for such number of shares of the institution into which the others shall have been merged or consolidated or of the acquiring corporation in a share exchange; or

To cause to be paid or delivered to each shareholder the amount of cash or securities of any other corporation or combination of cash and such securities as, under the plan of merger, share exchange, or consolidation, the said shareholder may be entitled to receive.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 13, §§ 4, 6; Code 1933, § 13-1405; Ga. L. 1973, p. 278, § 2; Code 1933, § 41A-2408, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, § 68; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 15; Ga. L. 2007, p. 502, § 11/SB 70.

Editor’s notes.

The amendment to this Code section by Ga. L. 1989, p. 946, § 68, was superseded by the amendment by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 15, which was enacted later.

Law reviews.

For survey article on business associations, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 13 (1982).